de: Stärkenkategorie des Gitarrensaitensatzes: Balanced Tension; Custom Light; Extra Heavy; Extra Light; Heavy; Light; Light Top/Heavy Bottom; Medium; Regular; Sonstige
es: Categoría de calibre del juego de cuerdas de guitarra: Tensión equilibrada; Ligero personalizado; Extra grueso; Extra ligero; Grueso; Ligero; Superior ligero/inferior grueso; Medio; Regular; Otro
it: Categoria di calibro dei set di corde per chitarra: Tensione bilanciata; Custom light; Extra heavy; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light top/heavy bottom; Medium; Regular; Altro
en: Guitar string set gauge category: Balanced tension; Custom light; Extra heavy; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light top/heavy bottom; Medium; Regular; Other
zh-CN: 吉他琴弦套装规格分类: 均衡张力; 定制细; 特粗; 特细; 粗; 细; 上细下粗; 中等; 常规; 其他
fr: Catégorie de tirant du jeu de cordes de guitare: Tension équilibrée; Léger personnalisé; Extra fort; Extra léger; Fort; Léger; Aigus légers/graves forts; Moyen; Régulier; Autre
ru: Категория калибра комплекта гитарных струн: Сбалансированное натяжение; Специальное легкое; Экстра-тяжелое; Экстра-легкое; Тяжелое; Легкое; Легкий верх / тяжелый низ; Среднее; Стандартное; Другое
bg-BG: Категория на дебелината на комплекта китарни струни: Балансирано напрежение; Персонализирани леки; Супер тежки; Супер леки; Тежки; Леки; Леки отгоре/тежки отдолу; Средни; Стандартни; Други
pt-PT: Categoria de calibre do conjunto de cadeia de guitarra: Tensão equilibrada; Leve personalizada; Extra pesada; Extra leve; Pesada; Leve; Leve em cima/pesada em baixo; Média; Normal; Outro
ja: ギターストリングセットゲージカテゴリー: バランステンション; カスタムライト; エクストラヘビー; エクストラライト; ヘビー; ライト; ライトトップ/ヘビーボトム; ミディアム; レギュラー; その他
nb: Gitarstyrkemålerkategori: Balansert spenning; Tilpasset lett; Ekstra tung; Ekstra lett; Tung; Lett; Lett topp / tung bunn; Medium; Standard; Annet
hu: Gitárhúr-szett vastagsági kategóriája: Kiegyenlített feszességű; Egyedi vékony; Extra vastag; Extra vékony; Vastag; Vékony; Vékony felső / vastag alsó; Közepes; Normál; Egyéb
fi: Kitaran kielisarjan paksuusluokka: Tasapainotettu jännite; Erikoiskevyt; Erittäin raskas; Erittäin kevyt; Raskas; Kevyt; Kevyt yläosa / raskas alaosa; Keskiraskas; Normaali; Muu
sv: Tjocklekskategori för gitarrsträngset: Balanserad spänning; Custom light; Extra heavy; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light top/heavy bottom; Medium; Regular; Övrigt
cs: Kategorie kytarových strun podle tloušťky: Vyvážené pnutí; Custom light; Extra heavy; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light top / heavy bottom; Medium; Regular; Jiné
th: กีต้าร์ หรือ ตั้งเกจหมวด: แรงดึงสมดุล; คัสตอมไลต์; เอ็กซ์ตร้าเฮฟวี; เอ็กซ์ตร้าไลต์; เฮฟวี; ไลต์; บนไลต์/ล่างเฮฟวี; มีเดียม; เรกูลาร์; อื่นๆ
da: Tykkelseskategori for guitarsæt: Balanceret spænding; Custom light; Extra heavy; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light top/heavy bottom; Medium; Regular; Andet
zh-TW: 吉他弦組線徑類別: 平衡張力; 客製化輕張力; 極重張力; 極輕張力; 重張力; 輕張力; 上輕下重張力; 中張力; 一般張力; 其他
sl-SI: Kategorija debeline kompleta kitarskih strun: Uravnotežena napetost; Prilagojeno tanke; Izjemno debele; Izjemno tanke; Debele; Tanke; Tanke zgoraj/debele spodaj; Srednje; Standardne; Drugo
pt-BR: Guitarra jogo de cordas categoria de calibre: Tensão balanceada; Leve personalizada; Extra pesada; Extra leve; Pesada; Leve; Primas leves/bordões pesados; Média; Regular; Outra
lt-LT: Gitaros stygų rinkinio storio kategorija: Subalansuoto įtempimo; „Custom light“; Ypač storos („Extra heavy“); Ypač plonos („Extra light“); Storos („Heavy“); Plonos („Light“); Plonas viršus / storas apačia; Vidutinės („Medium“); Standartinės („Regular“); Kita
el: Κατηγορία πάχους σετ χορδών κιθάρας: Balanced tension; Custom light; Extra heavy; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light top/heavy bottom; Medium; Regular; Άλλο
ko: 기타 스트링 세트 게이지 카테고리: 밸런스드 텐션; 커스텀 라이트; 엑스트라 헤비; 엑스트라 라이트; 헤비; 라이트; 라이트 탑/헤비 바텀; 미디엄; 레귤러; 기타
hr-HR: Kategorija kalibracije žica za gitaru: Uravnotežena napetost; Custom tanke; Ekstra debele; Ekstra tanke; Debele; Tanke; Tanke gornje / debele donje; Srednje; Regularne; Ostalo
sk-SK: Kategória hrúbky súpravy gitarových strún: Balanced tension; Custom light; Extra heavy; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light top/heavy bottom; Medium; Regular; Iné
ro-RO: Categorie de calibru chitară și set: Tensiune echilibrată; Subțiri personalizate; Extra groase; Extra subțiri; Groase; Subțiri; Sus subțiri/jos groase; Medii; Standard; Altele
nl: Gitaarsnarenset dikte categorie: Balanced tension; Custom light; Extra heavy; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light top/heavy bottom; Medium; Regular; Overig
pl: Kategoria grubości zestawu strun gitarowych: Zrównoważony naciąg; Niestandardowe lekkie; Bardzo ciężkie; Bardzo lekkie; Ciężkie; Lekkie; Lekka góra / ciężki dół; Średnie; Standardowe; Inne
vi: Cỡ dây đàn guitar: Độ căng cân bằng; Mỏng tùy chỉnh; Siêu dày; Siêu mỏng; Dày; Mỏng; Trên mỏng/dưới dày; Trung bình; Thường; Khác
tr: Gitar tel seti kalınlık kategorisi: Dengeli gerilim; Özel hafif; Ekstra ağır; Ekstra hafif; Ağır; Hafif; Hafif üst/ağır alt; Orta; Normal; Diğer